Utah statutes.
78B-13-107.   Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this chapter is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, upon request of a party, shall be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

